test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-3tav-cg-examples_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - koonjâl: # 2B ###  xxy:xy
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Nom: koonjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Gen: koonnjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Acc: koonnjâl
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Ill: konjâlân
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Loc: konjâlist
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Com: konjâláin
    koonjâl+N+Sg+Abe: koonnjâlttáá
    koonjâl+N+Ess:    konjâlin
    koonjâl+N+Par:    konjâlid
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Nom: konjâleh
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Gen: konjâlij
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Acc: konjâlijd
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Ill: konjâláid
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Loc: konjâlijn
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Com: konjâlijguin
    koonjâl+N+Pl+Abe: konjâlijttáá


  Noun - riäntus: # 2A ### xyy:xy
    riäntus+N+Sg+Nom: riäntus
    riäntus+N+Sg+Gen: riänttus
    riäntus+N+Sg+Acc: riänttus
    riäntus+N+Sg+Ill: riänttusân
    riäntus+N+Sg+Loc: riänttusist
    riäntus+N+Sg+Com: riänttusáin
    riäntus+N+Sg+Abe: riänttusttáá
    riäntus+N+Ess:    riäntusin
    riäntus+N+Par:    riäntusid
    riäntus+N+Pl+Nom: riänttuseh
    riäntus+N+Pl+Gen: riänttusij
    riäntus+N+Pl+Acc: riänttusijd
    riäntus+N+Pl+Ill: riänttusáid
    riäntus+N+Pl+Loc: riänttusijn
    riäntus+N+Pl+Com: riänttusijguin
    riäntus+N+Pl+Abe: riänttusijttáá
